Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-745
Appeals.

In addition to any other remedy a licensee may have, any licensee or
any person considering himself or herself aggrieved by any action of the department
under the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act may appeal the action, and the appeal shall
be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under
the act.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 45-718;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 30.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.